Maryland, session 2025, HB1164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(1) MANY INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCE HOMELESSNESS BECAUSE OF
ECONOMIC HARDSHIP, A SEVERE SHORTAGE OF SAFE AND AFFORDABLE HOUSING,
THE INABILITY TO SECURE GAINFUL EMPLOYMENT, AND DISINTEGRATING AND
SHRINKING SOCIAL SAFETY NETS;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1164*

HOUSE BILL 1164
(2) RESPONDING TO THE GROWING CRISIS OF HOMELESSNESS WITH
CRIMINAL SANCTIONS TO PUSH INDIVIDUALS OUT OF PUBLIC SPACES AND INTO
COURTS AND JAILS IS COSTLY, INHUMANE, AND INEFFECTIVE AND VIOLATES BASIC
CIVIL, HUMAN, AND CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS;
(3) THE EXISTENCE OF HOMELESSNESS REQUIRES THAT CIVIL AND
HUMAN RIGHTS THAT ARE AMPLY PROTECTED IN THE HOME AND IN OTHER PRIVATE
PLACES BE EXTENDED TO THE PUBLIC SPACES IN WHICH INDIVIDUALS
EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS LIVE TO ENSURE THE EQUAL RIGHTS OF ALL
CITIZENS OF THE STATE;
(4) COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES THROUGHOUT THE UNITED
STATES ARE ENACTING AND ENFORCING LOCAL LAWS THAT CRIMINALIZE BASIC
ACTS OF SURVIVAL, INCLUDING:
(I) SLEEPING, SITTING, OR LOITERING IN A PUBLIC SPACE;
(II) SLEEPING IN A LEGALLY PARKED VEHICLE;
(III) HAVING A REASONABLE EXPECTATION OF PRIVACY FOR
PERSONAL PROPERTY;
(IV) STORING BELONGINGS;
(V) ASKING FOR HELP; AND
(VI) USING A BLANKET TO COVER ONESELF IN A
NONOBSTRUCTIVE MANNER REGARDLESS OF OUTDOOR TEMPERATURE;
(5) THESE LOCAL LAWS:
(I) RESULT IN INDIVIDUALS BEING CRIMINALLY PUNISHED FOR
DOING WHAT ANY INDIVIDUAL MUST DO TO SURVIVE;
(II) DO NOT REDUCE THE INCIDENCE OF HOMELESSNESS OR
CRIME, BUT RATHER INCREASE INCARCERATION RATES AND FINANCIAL
INDEBTEDNESS OF INDIVIDUALS WHO SIMPLY HAVE NO MEANS OF SUPPORTING
THEMSELVES; AND
(III) PROLONG HOMELESSNESS BY MAKING IT MORE DIFFICULT
FOR INDIVIDUALS TO SECURE HOUSING, EMPLOYMENT, AND MEDICAL CARE;

HOUSE BILL 1164 3
(6) WHILE THESE LOCAL LAWS APPLY TO ALL RESIDENTS IN THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION, THE LAWS:
(I) DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACT INDIVIDUALS
EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS; AND
(II) ARE OFTEN SELECTIVELY ENFORCED AGAINST PEOPLE
BASED ON THEIR APPEARANCE OR AN ASSUMPTION OF HOMELESSNESS; AND
(7) PROHIBITING LOCAL JURISDICTIONS IN THE STATE FROM
PASSING OR ENFORCING LOCAL LAWS THAT DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACT OR ARE
INTENDED TO IMPACT INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS WILL PERMIT
THE LOCAL JURISDICTIONS TO REDIRECT RESOURCES AND SHIFT THE FOCUS FROM
LAW ENFORCEMENT TO POSITIVE APPROACHES THAT DIRECTLY ADDRESS
HOMELESSNESS AND POVERTY.
(B) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT ENACT OR ENFORCE A LOCAL
LAW THAT IS DESIGNED TO PREVENT AN INDIVIDUAL FROM:
(1) RESTING OR SLEEPING IN A PUBLIC SPACE;
(2) PROTECTING ONESELF FROM THE ELEMENTS IN A MANNER THAT
DOES NOT OBSTRUCT THE USE OF OR ACCESS TO PRIVATE PROPERTY; OR
(3) SLEEPING IN A LEGALLY PARKED VEHICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.